Maryland, session 2025, HB0727.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
16–125.
(A) AN APPLICANT FOR A DRIVER’S LICENSE OR A LICENSE HOLDER MAY
VOLUNTARILY DISCLOSE, ON A FORM PROVIDED BY THE ADMINISTRATION, THAT
THE APPLICANT OR LICENSE HOLDER HAS BEEN DIAGNOSED BY A PHYSICIAN, OR IS
THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A MINOR WHO HAS BEEN DIAGNOSED BY A PHYSICIAN,
WITH ANY OF THE FOLLOWING CONDITIONS:
(1) AUTISM OR AUTISM SPECTRUM DISORDER;
(2) ATTENTION–DEFICIT/HYPERACTIVITY DISORDER;
(3) DOWN SYNDROME;
(4) ALZHEIMER’S DISEASE;
(5) TRAUMATIC BRAIN INJURY;
(6) POST–TRAUMATIC STRESS DISORDER;
(7) DIABETES;
(8) AN AUTOIMMUNE DISORDER;
(9) DEAFNESS OR HEARING IMPAIRMENT;
(10) BLINDNESS OR VISION IMPAIRMENT; OR
(11) ANY OTHER MENTALLY OR PHYSICALLY LIMITING DISABILITY OR
DISORDER.
(B) (1) IF AN INDIVIDUAL PROVIDES A VOLUNTARY DISCLOSURE UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL INCLUDE A BRIEF
DESCRIPTION OF THE DISCLOSURE IN THE APPLICANT’S DRIVING RECORD.

HOUSE BILL 727 3
(2) THE DESCRIPTION OF THE VOLUNTARY DISCLOSURE MAY NOT
INCLUDE:
(I) ANY PERSONAL IDENTIFYING INFORMATION OF AN
INDIVIDUAL NAMED IN THE DISCLOSURE; OR
(II) THE SPECIFIC DIAGNOSIS OR CONDITION DISCLOSED.
(C) (1) ON A FORM PROVIDED BY THE ADMINISTRATION, AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO HAS MADE A VOLUNTARY DISCLOSURE MAY SUBMIT A REQUEST TO REMOVE
THE DESCRIPTION OF THE VOLUNTARY DISCLOSURE FROM THE INDIVIDUAL’S
DRIVING RECORD.
(2) AFTER RECEIVING A PROPERLY COMPLETED REQUEST FOR
REMOVAL, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL REMOVE THE DESCRIPTION OF THE
VOLUNTARY DISCLOSURE FROM THE INDIVIDUAL’S DRIVING RECORD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.